Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2150.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) There is hereby established the advisory commission on
Asian-American Pacific Islander affairs. The commission shall be advisory
to the governor and shall be within the office of the governor and a part
thereof.
(b) As used in sections 1 through 6, and amendments thereto,
"commission" means the advisory commission on Asian-American Pacific
Islander affairs.
Sec. 2. (a) (1) The commission shall consist of seven members who
shall be appointed as follows:
(A) One member shall be appointed by the president of the senate;
(B) one member shall be appointed by the minority leader of the
senate;
(C) one member shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(D) one member shall be appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives; and
(E) three members shall be appointed by the governor.
(2) Each initial member of the commission shall be appointed by the
respective appointing authority on or before July 15, 2025.
(b) Members shall be appointed for terms of three years and until
successors are appointed and qualified.
(c) A person appointed to fill a vacancy that occurs prior to the
expiration of a term shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(d) Not more than four members shall be members of the same
political party.
(e) Subject to the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4315c, and amendments
thereto, each congressional district in the state of Kansas shall be
represented on the commission by at least one member who is a resident of
the district at the time of appointment and the remainder shall represent the
state at large.
Sec. 3. (a) The commission shall organize annually by electing a

HB 2150 2
chairperson and a secretary from its membership. The commission may
adopt such rules of procedure as the commission deems necessary for the
conduct of business.
(b) The commission shall meet at least four times a year. The
chairperson may call additional meetings. A majority of members shall
constitute a quorum.
(c) Members of the commission attending meetings of such
commission shall be paid the amounts provided for in K.S.A. 75-3223(e),
and amendments thereto.
Sec. 4. The commission shall have the following functions, powers
and duties:
(a) Gather and disseminate information and conduct hearings,
conferences and special studies on problems and programs concerning
Asian-American Pacific Islanders;
(b) coordinate, assist and cooperate with the efforts of state
departments and agencies to serve the needs of Asian-American Pacific
Islanders especially in the areas of culture, education, employment, health,
housing, welfare and recreation;
(c) develop, coordinate and assist other public and private
associations and organizations with understanding the problems of Asian-
American Pacific Islanders;
(d) develop, coordinate and assist other public and private
associations and organizations to provide services to Asian-American
Pacific Islanders;
(e) propose new programs concerning Asian-American Pacific
Islanders;
(f) evaluate existing programs and proposed legislation concerning
Asian-American Pacific Islanders;
(g) stimulate public awareness of the concerns and problems of
Asian-American Pacific Islanders by conducting a program of public
education;
(h) conduct training programs for community leadership and service
project staff;
(i) accept contributions to assist in the implementation and
administration of this section and seek and enlist the cooperation of
private, charitable, religious, labor, civic and benevolent organizations for
such purposes;
(j) solicit, receive and expend federal funds to assist in the
implementation and administration of this section and enter into contracts
and agreements with any federal agency for such purposes; and
(k) establish advisory committees on special subjects.
Sec. 5. (a) The commission may appoint, subject to the approval of
the governor, an executive director who shall be qualified by education

HB 2150 3
and experience to assume the responsibilities of such office.
(b) The executive director shall be the administrative officer of the
commission and shall serve the commission by:
(1) Gathering information;
(2) disseminating findings of fact and other information;
(3) forwarding proposals and evaluations to the governor, the
legislature and various state agencies;
(4) carrying out public education programs;
(5) conducting hearings and conferences; and
(6) performing other duties necessary for the proper operation of the
commission.
Sec. 6. The executive director of the commission may appoint,
subject to the approval of the commission and the governor, technical
advisors and assistants to develop, assist and cooperate with local
organizations and associations on Asian-American Pacific Islander
concerns.
Sec. 7. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.